Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.040

Salaries of certain directors and chief executive officers.

Subject to RCW 41.04.820, the directors of the several departments and members of the several boards and commissions, whose salaries are fixed by the governor and the chief executive officers of the agencies named in RCW 43.03.028(1) as now or hereafter amended shall each severally receive such salaries, payable in monthly installments, as shall be fixed by the governor or the appropriate salary fixing authority, and, unless set according to RCW 41.26.717(1), in an amount not to exceed the recommendations of the office of financial management. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(1) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(2) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(3) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management.

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

[ 2018 c 272 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 319; 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 8. Prior: 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5; 2010 c 1 s 5; 2009 c 5 s 5; 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 914; 1986 c 155 s 12; 1977 ex.s. c 127 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 43 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.03.040; prior: 1961 c 307 s 2; 1955 c 340 s 2; 1949 c 111 s 1; 1937 c 224 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10776-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—2010 c 1: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Effective date—2009 c 5: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Severability—Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 43: See note following RCW 43.03.027.